Massachusetts, session 194th, H4213.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 1 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, chapter
415 of the acts of 1987 or any other general or special law to the contrary, call firefighters,
volunteer firefighters and fire engineers in the town of Egremont who would be subject to
mandatory retirement on the last day of the month in which they turn 65 years old, and, if a
member of the retirement system, would be retired for superannuation, may serve in such
position until the date of their actual retirement or non-reappointment, whichever occurs first;
provided, however, that said firefighter or fire engineer is mentally and physically capable of
performing the duties of the position. The town of Egremont may, at the employee’s expense,
require that the employee be examined by an impartial physician, acceptable to the town, to
determine the firefighter or fire engineer’s fitness to remain in service.
(b) No deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of call firefighters,
volunteer firefighters and fire engineers in the town of Egremont pursuant to chapter 32 of the
of 2

General Laws for any service performed by such firefighters or fire engineers subsequent to
reaching the age of 65 for retirement or pension purposes.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2